Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7608.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-7 of the General Laws entitled "Operation of Railroads
Generally" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-7-13. Minimum crews required.
(a) No train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight may be
operated unless it has a crew consisting of at least two (2) persons. For the purposes of this section,
the phrase "train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight" shall not include
hostler service or utility employees.
(b) Any company, individual, or business entity that willfully violates this section may be
subject to a fine as follows:
(l) Not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000), for a first offense;
(2) Not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars
($5,000), for a second offense committed within three (3) years; and
(3) Not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), nor more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), for a third offense and for subsequent offenses committed within a period of three (3)
years.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on October 1, 2026.
========
LC005020
========
LC005020 - Page 2 of 3